Maine, session 132, LD1568.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §2054, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2019, c. 319, §1 and
c. 397, §25, is further amended by amending subparagraph (22) to read:
(22) A University of Maine System vehicle operated by a University of Maine
System police officer; and
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §2054, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2019, c. 319, §1 and
c. 397, §25, is further amended by amending subparagraph (23) to read:
(23) A life support transport vehicle when parked on a Department of
Transportation ferry vessel and being used to transport a person who requires
constant medical support to survive.; and
Sec. 3. 29-A MRSA §2054, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2019, c. 319, §1 and
c. 397, §25, is further amended by enacting a new subparagraph (24) to read:
Page 1 - 132LR2456(03)

(24) A municipal vehicle operated by a harbor master appointed by a municipal
officer pursuant to Title 38, section 1 or a deputy harbor master appointed pursuant
to Title 38, section 2.
Sec. 4. 29-A MRSA §2054, sub-§2, ¶F, as amended by PL 2023, c. 131, §1, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (5) to read:
(5) A municipality may authorize a harbor master or deputy harbor master
appointed under Title 38, section 1 or 2, respectively, to use one red or combination
red and white flashing auxiliary light mounted in the windshield or on the
dashboard at the front of a vehicle or 2 flashing red or combination red and white
auxiliary lights mounted on the front of the vehicle above the front bumper and
below the hood and one red auxiliary light mounted in the rear window area. The
light or lights may be displayed but may be used only while the harbor master or
deputy harbor master is responding to a watercraft emergency. A light mounted
on the dashboard or in the windshield must be shielded so that the emitted light
does not interfere with the operator's vision. The authorization for the use of lights
or a siren may be revoked at any time by the municipality.
A vehicle described in this subparagraph may be operated only when exercising
emergency privileges by a person who has completed an emergency vehicle
operation course provided by the Department of Public Safety, Bureau of State
Police. A municipality may authorize an authorized emergency vehicle owned by
a municipality and operated by a harbor master or deputy harbor master as
described in subsection 1, paragraph B, subparagraph (24) to be equipped with a
siren in addition to authorized lights pursuant to this subparagraph.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2456(03)